Louisiana, session 2026, HB166.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:1109(A) and 1109.1(A)(introductory paragraph), (9), and (10)
are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1109. Acadiana Regional Juvenile Justice District; creation; definitions; domicile
A. The Acadiana Regional Juvenile Justice District is hereby created as a
political subdivision of the state having a territorial jurisdiction throughout the
parishes of Acadia, Allen, Evangeline, Iberia, Jefferson Davis, St. Landry, St.
Martin, and St. Mary, and Vermilion.
* * *
§1109.1. Board of commissioners; appointments; terms
A. The Acadiana Regional Juvenile Justice District Commission is hereby
created to control, administer, and manage the affairs of the district. The commission
shall be composed of a board of eleven ten commissioners who shall be appointed
as follows:
* * *
(9) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing within Vermilion Parish, shall be jointly appointed by the chief judge and
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 166 ENROLLED
district attorney for the Fifteenth Judicial District and the sheriff of Vermilion Parish
for an initial term of four years.
(10) (9) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing within the district, shall be jointly appointed by the parish presidents of the
parishes included within the district and the presidents of the police juries in those
parishes without home rule charters or parish presidents for an initial term of four
years.
(11) (10) One commissioner, who shall be a qualified elector domiciled and
residing within the district, shall be jointly appointed by the judges of the city courts
within the district exercising juvenile jurisdiction for an initial term of four years.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 15:1109.1(A)(11) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
Section 3 This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.